Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Franchise Agreements.

Sec. 45.25.100.
Consistency with state law.

The terms and conditions in an agreement between a manufacturer and a new motor vehicle dealer in this state, including a motor vehicle franchise agreement, that are inconsistent with the law of this state do not have any force or effect in this state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.110.
Termination of franchise agreements.

A manufacturer may not terminate a franchise agreement with a new motor vehicle dealer unless

the manufacturer has

complied with the notice requirements of this chapter; and

shown that there is good cause for the termination of the franchise agreement, and, if the reasons underlying the good cause can be corrected by the new motor vehicle dealer, the new motor vehicle dealer has failed for 120 days after delivery of the notice required by AS

45.25.120

to make the corrections; the circumstances identified under AS

45.25.120(a)(2)

for which a 15-day notice of termination is required do not qualify as reasons for which correction is allowed under this subparagraph; or

the new motor vehicle dealer has systematically engaged in fraud against consumers or the manufacturer or in the operation of the new motor vehicle dealership.

Notwithstanding (a)(1) of this section, a manufacturer may not terminate a franchise agreement with a new motor vehicle dealer because of the death or incapacity of an owner if the owner is not listed in the franchise as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer relied in the granting of the franchise.

In this section, “good cause” includes when the new motor vehicle dealer fails to comply with or observe a material provision of the franchise agreement. For the purposes of determining good cause under this subsection, reasonable sales and service performance criteria and capital and facility requirements may be considered material provisions only if the criteria or requirements were communicated in writing to the new motor vehicle dealer within a reasonable period before the effective date of the termination or nonrenewal so that a reasonable opportunity was afforded over a period of not less than six months to comply with the criteria or requirements.

A failure of a new motor vehicle dealer under (a) of this section that relates to the performance of the new motor vehicle dealer in sales, service, or level of customer satisfaction does not amount to good cause under this section if the new motor vehicle dealer failed to comply and the failure to comply was caused by

an insufficient supply of new motor vehicles; or

market, economic, or other factors that exist within the new motor vehicle dealer’s relevant market area and that were beyond the control of the new motor vehicle dealer.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 3, 4 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, in (a), twice added “agreement” following “franchise”, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “complied with” for “satisfied” at the beginning, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “120 days” for “60 days” following “failed for”, and substituted “subparagraph” for “paragraph” at the end; added (d).

Sec. 45.25.120.
Notice of termination.

A manufacturer shall furnish a notice of termination of a franchise agreement to a new motor vehicle dealer at least

90 days before the effective date of a termination, except as required under (2) or (3) of this subsection;

15 days before the effective date of a termination when the new motor vehicle dealer

is insolvent or is the subject of a bankruptcy or receivership proceeding;

has failed to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven consecutive business days; this subparagraph does not apply to closures due to acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer; or

is convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude or fraud under the law of this state, another state, the federal government, a territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia;

180 days before the effective date of the termination if the manufacturer or distributor is discontinuing the sale of the product line.

Notice required under (a) of this section must be in writing, shall be sent by certified mail or personally delivered to the new motor vehicle dealer, and must contain

a statement of intention to terminate the franchise;

a statement of the reasons for the termination; and

the date on which the termination takes effect.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.130.
Threat of termination.

A manufacturer or manufacturer representative may not coerce or attempt to coerce a new motor vehicle dealer to enter into an agreement with the manufacturer or a subsidiary of the manufacturer, or to do any other act unfair to the new motor vehicle dealer, by threatening to terminate a franchise agreement between the manufacturer or subsidiary of the manufacturer and the new motor vehicle dealer.

This section does not prohibit a voluntary agreement between a manufacturer and a new motor vehicle dealer or between a distributor and a new motor vehicle dealer to settle legitimate disputes.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.140.
Repurchase obligations on termination.

Upon the termination of a new motor vehicle dealer’s franchise agreement by the manufacturer or distributor, the manufacturer or distributor shall repurchase from the new motor vehicle dealer at

the new motor vehicle dealer’s net acquisition cost, if the motor vehicles have not been materially altered or damaged, all inventory consisting of unsold new motor vehicles that are current models;

the new motor vehicle dealer’s net acquisition cost, new motor vehicle models from the previous year that have been acquired from the manufacturer within the past two years before receipt of the notice of termination, but an adjustment based on mileage over 500 miles may be made;

the new motor vehicle dealer price listed in the current manufacturer’s parts catalog, less applicable allowances, new unused undamaged parts in their original, unbroken packaging and acquired from the manufacturer or distributor;

fair market value, signs, equipment, and furnishings that bear the manufacturer’s trademark or trade name, that have not been altered or damaged, and that were required by the manufacturer or distributor within five years preceding the notice of termination;

the new motor vehicle dealer’s net acquisition cost, special tools that have not been altered or materially damaged and that were purchased from the manufacturer or distributor within three years preceding the date of the termination; and

the lesser of the fair market value or the depreciated value, all manufacturer required computers, printers, and other electronic hardware, and electronic software, except that, if the new motor vehicle dealer leases the computers, printers, or other electronic hardware, or electronic software, the manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer the amount of money that is required for the new motor vehicle dealer to terminate the lease under the lease agreement.

Within 90 days after the effective date of the termination, the new motor vehicle dealer shall return the property required by (a) of this section to be repurchased to the manufacturer or distributor at the manufacturer’s or distributor’s expense. The manufacturer or distributor shall pay the compensation for the property within 60 days after the tender of inventory and other items if the new motor vehicle dealer has clear title to the property and is in a position to convey that title to the manufacturer or distributor. If the property is subject to a security interest, the manufacturer or distributor may make payment jointly to the new motor vehicle dealer and the holder of the security interest, and the manufacturer or distributor may offset these payments.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, in (a), in (a)(2), substituted “the new motor vehicle dealer's net acquisition cost, new motor vehicle models from the previous years” for “and models”, deleted “model” following “within the past two” and added “, but an adjustment based on mileage over 500 miles may be made” at the end; in (a)(3) inserted “manufacturer's” following “listed in the current” and deleted “, listed in the current price catalog” following “unbroken packaging”, in (a)(4), substituted “the manufacturer's trademark” for “a trademark” following “furnishings that bear”, in (a)(5), added “and” following “materially damaged”, added (a)(6), and made related and stylistic changes throughout the subsection.

Sec. 45.25.150.
Required compensation for new motor vehicle dealer facilities.

Upon termination by the manufacturer or distributor, the manufacturer or distributor shall compensate the new motor vehicle dealer for new motor vehicle dealer facilities a sum equivalent to the

rent for the unexpired term of the lease or 18 months, whichever period is shorter, if the new motor vehicle dealer is leasing the new motor vehicle dealership facilities from a lessor other than the manufacturer or distributor; or

reasonable rental value of the new motor vehicle dealership facilities for 18 months or until the facilities are leased or sold, whichever period is shorter, if the new motor vehicle dealer owns the new motor vehicle dealership facilities; the sum may be paid in monthly installments at the election of the manufacturer or distributor.

This section does not relieve a new motor vehicle dealer of the obligation to mitigate

damages under a lease, prevent a manufacturer from occupying and using the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities while paying rent, or preclude a manufacturer from negotiating a lease termination, sublease, or new lease; or

the costs of the relocation, substantial alteration, and remodeling of the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities for which payments are required under (f) of this section.

This section does not apply to a termination for

insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer or the filing of any petition by or against the new motor vehicle dealer under a bankruptcy or receivership law;

failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven consecutive business days;

conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer or its principal owners of a felony or a misdemeanor regardless of the punishment if the crime involves theft, dishonesty, or false statement;

revocation of a license required for the new motor vehicle dealer to operate; or

a fraudulent misrepresentation by the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer or distributor that is material to the new motor vehicle dealer’s agreement.

The payment required under (a) of this section is only required to the extent that the facilities were used for activities under the franchise agreement and only to the extent the facilities were not leased for unrelated purposes.

If payment under (a) of this section is made, the manufacturer or distributor is entitled to possession and use of the new motor vehicle dealership facilities for the period for which the payment is paid.

In addition to the payment required under AS

45.25.140

and (a) of this section, upon termination of a franchise agreement by the manufacturer under this chapter, the manufacturer shall, at the request and option of the new motor vehicle dealer, pay the new motor vehicle dealer the new motor vehicle dealer’s cost for a relocation, substantial alteration, or remodeling of the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities to the extent used for the manufacturer’s franchise, if

the manufacturer required the relocation, substantial alteration, or remodeling of the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities for a continuation or renewal of the franchise agreement; and

the relocation, substantial alteration, or remodeling of the new motor vehicle dealer’s facilities was completed within three years before the termination or is in process when the new motor vehicle dealer receives the notice of termination.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 6, 7 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, added (b)(2), and made related changes; added (f).

Sec. 45.25.160.
Prevention of or refusal to honor transfer of new motor vehicle dealership ownership.

A manufacturer may not unreasonably prevent or refuse to honor the transfer of ownership of a new motor vehicle dealership to a buyer who is capable of being licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer in this state and who meets the standards established by the manufacturer, if the standards are reasonable and applied uniformly.

Within 30 days after receipt of a written request from a new motor vehicle dealer for transfer of the ownership of a new motor vehicle dealership, a manufacturer may request, and the new motor vehicle dealer shall promptly provide, supplementary information that is reasonably necessary for the manufacturer to determine whether the manufacturer will approve the request for the transfer. If a manufacturer refuses to approve the transfer, the manufacturer shall give written notice to the new motor vehicle dealer of the refusal. The manufacturer shall give the notice to the new motor vehicle dealer within 75 days after the date the manufacturer has received both the written transfer request and supplementary information requested under this subsection. The notice must state the specific grounds for the refusal to approve the transfer. The manufacturer shall give the notice under this subsection by personal service or certified mail with return receipt requested. If the manufacturer does not give the notice within the time allowed under this subsection and does not exercise a right of first refusal under (c) of this section, the request shall be considered approved.

A manufacturer or distributor may exercise a contractual right of first refusal with respect to the proposed sale or other transfer of the interest of the dealer in a new motor vehicle dealership if

the sale or other transfer is to a person who is not a family member of an owner of the dealership, a managerial employee of the dealership owning 15 percent or more of the dealership, or a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity owned by the existing owners of the dealership; in this paragraph, “family member” means

the spouse of an owner of the dealership;

the child, stepchild, grandchild, brother, sister, or parent of an owner of the dealership; or

a spouse of a person identified in (B) of this paragraph;

the manufacturer or distributor notifies the new motor vehicle dealer in writing of the intent to exercise the right of first refusal; within 30 days after receipt of a written request from a new motor vehicle dealer for transfer of the ownership of a new motor vehicle dealership, a manufacturer or distributor may request, and the new motor vehicle dealer shall promptly provide, related information generally used by a manufacturer or distributor to conduct its review of a proposed intent to exercise the right of first refusal and supplementary information that is reasonably necessary for the manufacturer or distributor to determine whether the manufacturer or distributor will exercise the right of first refusal; if the manufacturer or distributor decides to exercise the right of first refusal, the manufacturer or distributor shall give written notice to the new motor vehicle dealer of the decision within 75 days after receiving the completed transfer request, related information, and requested supplementary information; the manufacturer or distributor shall give the notice under this paragraph by personal service or certified mail with return receipt requested; if the manufacturer or distributor fails to notify the dealer within the 75-day period that the manufacturer or distributor will exercise the right of first refusal, the manufacturer or distributor may not exercise the right of first refusal;

the exercise of the right of first refusal provides to the new motor vehicle dealer the same compensation as, or greater compensation than, the new motor vehicle dealer had negotiated to receive from the proposed buyer or other transferee; and

the manufacturer or distributor agrees to pay the reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney and accountant fees that do not exceed the usual, customary, and reasonable fees charged for similar work done in the state for other clients, incurred before the manufacturer or distributor exercised its right of first refusal by the proposed buyer or transferee to negotiate and implement the terms of the contract for the sale or transfer.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, rewrote the section.

Sec. 45.25.170.
Succession.

A manufacturer or distributor may not prevent or refuse to honor the succession to a new motor vehicle franchise of an heir or devisee under a will of a franchisee, under a written instrument filed with the manufacturer or distributor designating any person as the successor franchisee, or under AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 (Uniform Probate Code), except that

a designated successor must, within 60 days after the owner’s death or incapacity, give the manufacturer or distributor written notice of the intent to succeed, and the designee must agree to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the current franchise agreement;

the manufacturer or distributor may request from the designated successor personal and financial data that are reasonably necessary to determine the qualifications of the designated successor; the designated successor shall provide the information within 60 days after receiving the request;

the manufacturer or distributor may not unreasonably withhold approval of the succession; if the manufacturer or distributor refuses to honor the succession, the manufacturer or distributor shall send written notice to the proposed successor within 60 days after receiving the information requested in (2) of this subsection or within 60 days after receiving the notice of the proposed successor’s intent to succeed, whichever is later.

The notice required by (a)(3) of this section must state the specific grounds for not approving the proposed successor. Within 30 days after the proposed successor’s receipt of the notice, the proposed successor may file a protest with the superior court to determine whether the manufacturer or distributor has unreasonably withheld approval.

This section does not preclude the owner of a new motor vehicle dealership from filing with the manufacturer or distributor a written instrument designating any person as a successor. If there are competing successors, the written instrument governs who may submit a proposal as a successor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.180.
New dealerships.

Before a manufacturer or distributor enters into a franchise establishing or relocating a new motor vehicle dealer within a relevant market area where the same line make is represented, the manufacturer or distributor shall give 90 days’ written notice to each new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make in the relevant market area of the intention to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealer or to relocate an existing new motor vehicle dealer within that relevant market area.

Within 30 days after receiving the notice required under (a) of this section or within 30 days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer or distributor, a new motor vehicle dealer may bring a declaratory judgment action in the superior court of this state to determine whether good cause exists for the establishment or relocation of a proposed new motor vehicle dealer. If an action is filed, the manufacturer or distributor may not establish or relocate the proposed new motor vehicle dealer until the court has rendered a decision on the matter.

This section does not prohibit

the relocation of an existing new motor vehicle dealer to a new location not within four miles of an existing new motor vehicle dealer;

the appointment of a successor new motor vehicle dealer at the same location as its predecessor or within a two-mile radius from any boundary of the predecessor’s former location within two years from the date when the predecessor ceased operations or was terminated, whichever occurred later; or

the entering into of a renewal of, replacement of, or succeeding franchise agreement with an existing new motor vehicle dealer whose operations will continue at the existing new motor vehicle dealer’s current location.

When determining whether good cause exists for establishing or relocating an additional new motor vehicle dealer for the same line make, the superior court shall consider the existing circumstances, including

whether the establishment of an additional franchise or relocation of the existing new motor vehicle dealer appears to be warranted by economic and marketing conditions, including anticipated future changes;

the retail sales and service business transacted by the protesting new motor vehicle dealer and other new motor vehicle dealers of the same line make with a place of business in the relevant market area to be served by the additional franchise or proposed new location of an existing new motor vehicle dealer during the three-year period immediately preceding the notice;

the investment necessarily made and obligations incurred by the protesting new motor vehicle dealer to perform the protesting new motor vehicle dealer’s obligations under existing franchise agreements;

the permanency of the investment of the protesting new motor vehicle dealer;

whether it is beneficial or injurious to the public welfare for an additional franchise to be established or for the existing new motor vehicle dealer to be relocated;

whether the manufacturer has denied the manufacturer’s existing new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make the opportunity for reasonable growth, market expansion, or relocation; and

whether the proposed relocation is farther away from the protesting new motor vehicle dealer.

Under this section, a manufacturer has the burden of proving that good cause exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation of a new motor vehicle dealer that the manufacturer has proposed, and the new motor vehicle dealer has the burden of proving that good cause exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation of a new motor vehicle dealer that the new motor vehicle dealer has proposed.

In this section,

“relevant market area” means the greater of the area

within a radius of 14 miles around an existing new motor vehicle dealer; or

of responsibility defined in a governing franchise agreement;

“relocate” and “relocation” do not include the relocation of a new motor vehicle dealer within two miles of the new motor vehicle dealer’s established place of business.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 9, 10 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f); relettered in 2018, at which time existing subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, added (d)(6) and (7), and made related changes; added (f) [now (e)].

Sec. 45.25.190.
Arbitration.

In a controversy between a manufacturer and a new motor vehicle dealer under AS

45.25.010

—

45.25.310

, neither the manufacturer nor the new motor vehicle dealer is required to submit the controversy to arbitration. If both the manufacturer and the new motor vehicle dealer agree to submit a controversy under AS

45.25.010

—

45.25.310

to arbitration, the arbitration shall be conducted under AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

(Uniform Arbitration Act) or AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

(Revised Uniform Arbitration Act), as applicable, the manufacturer and the new motor vehicle dealer shall each select one arbitrator, and both the manufacturer and the new motor vehicle dealer shall select the third arbitrator.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 48 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 43 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 11 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “shall be conducted under AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

” for “shall be conducted under AS

09.43.020

—

09.43.180

”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, twice substituted “AS

45.25.010

—

45.25.310

” for “AS

45.25.010

—

45.25.320

”.

Sec. 45.25.200.
Payment and approval of claims.

A manufacturer shall pay a new motor vehicle dealer for all warranty work. The manufacturer may not deny a claim for warranty work to resolve a condition discovered and properly repaired by the dealer during the course of a separate repair, if the dealer provides the required documentation demonstrating the need for the repair. A manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer for the approved warranty repairs in accordance with the schedule of compensation that applies to the repairs when the new motor vehicle dealer makes the repairs.

A new motor vehicle dealer shall submit a claim for warranty work to the manufacturer within 90 days after the new motor vehicle dealer completes the work on the new motor vehicle. The new motor vehicle dealer shall submit the claim in the manner that the manufacturer requires.

Within 30 days after the manufacturer receives a claim from a new motor vehicle dealer under (b) of this section, the manufacturer shall approve or disapprove the claim in writing or electronically. If a manufacturer does not disapprove a claim as required by this subsection, the claim is considered approved. The manufacturer shall pay the claim within 30 days after the approval of the claim.

If a manufacturer disapproves a claim that the new motor vehicle dealer submits under (b) of this section, a manufacturer shall notify the new motor vehicle dealer in writing or electronically and shall state the reasons for disapproving the claim. A new motor vehicle dealer may correct and resubmit the claim within 30 days after the new motor vehicle dealer receives the written or electronic notice that the manufacturer disapproved the claim.

A manufacturer may not initiate or conduct an audit to determine the validity of paid claims for new motor vehicle dealer warranty work unless the manufacturer initiates the audit within one year after the payment of the claim. The manufacturer may not perform more than one audit in a calendar year to determine the validity of paid claims for new motor vehicle dealer warranty work.

A manufacturer may not initiate or conduct an audit to determine the validity of paid incentive claims unless the manufacturer initiates the audit within one year after the payment of the claim or the conclusion of the incentive program, whichever event occurs later. The manufacturer may not perform more than one audit in a calendar year to determine the validity of paid incentive claims.

Notwithstanding the limitations under (e) and (f) of this section, if a manufacturer reasonably suspects fraud, the manufacturer may audit a dealer for fraudulent claims during any period in which an action for fraud may be commenced under applicable state law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 12,
ch. 50, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 30, 2018.

Sec. 45.25.210.
Rates for warranty and other work.

A manufacturer shall provide each of its new motor vehicle dealers with the schedule of compensation that the manufacturer shall pay to the new motor vehicle dealer for warranty work that the manufacturer requires the new motor vehicle dealer to perform for the manufacturer’s products.

The schedule of compensation must include compensation for parts and labor and must comply with this section. The compensation for parts must include the average retail percentage markup that the new motor vehicle dealer charges.

Unless otherwise agreed to by the manufacturer and the new motor vehicle dealer, the rates in the schedule of compensation may not be less than the rates that the new motor vehicle dealer charges retail customers for similar nonwarranty service work.

To establish the retail percentage markup, the new motor vehicle dealer shall submit to the manufacturer 100 sequential chronologically issued retail service repair orders paid by customers for warranty-like repairs, or 90 consecutive days of retail service repair orders paid by customers for warranty-like repairs, whichever number of retail service repair orders is less. The retail service repair orders that the new motor vehicle dealer submits must cover retail repairs that the new motor vehicle dealer made less than 180 days before the new motor vehicle dealer submits them to the manufacturer.

A manufacturer may not require a new motor vehicle dealer to establish the retail percentage markup by a method other than the method required by (d) of this section. When establishing the retail percentage markup, a manufacturer may not require the new motor vehicle dealer to provide information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to provide, including part-by-part or transaction-by- transaction calculations.

A manufacturer may not include in the calculation of the rates in the schedule of compensation

repairs for manufacturer special events, manufacturer specials, or manufacturer promotional discounts;

parts sold at wholesale;

routine maintenance not covered under warranty, including the replacement of fluids, filters, and belts, unless the new motor vehicle dealer provides the routine maintenance in the course of making a repair;

nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not have an individual part number;

tires, batteries, and light bulbs;

vehicle reconditioning; and

repair orders for motor vehicle body repairs if an insurer pays for the repairs.

The retail percentage markup calculated under (d) of this section may not take effect more than 30 days after the manufacturer approves the dealer’s proposed rate, or after the manufacturer is considered to have approved the dealer’s proposed rate under this section. If a manufacturer does not disapprove the dealer’s proposed rate within 30 days after the new motor vehicle dealer submits the rate application, then the dealer’s proposed rate shall be considered approved.

A manufacturer may disapprove a rate proposed by the new motor vehicle dealer under this section if the manufacturer demonstrates that the proposed rate is materially miscalculated or unreasonable compared to other similarly situated new motor vehicle dealers in this state.

A new motor vehicle dealer may not receive more than one rate increase under this section in a calendar year.

History.

(§ 12 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 12,
ch. 50, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 30, 2018.

Sec. 45.25.220.
Performance and reimbursement of certain repairs.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, if a new motor vehicle needs repairs that are covered under a manufacturer’s warranty, and if the new motor vehicle is located in a remote location, the manufacturer shall make reasonable efforts to arrange for the new motor vehicle to be repaired in the remote location.

If a manufacturer determines that repairs cannot reasonably be made in a remote location within the manufacturer’s guidelines, the manufacturer may arrange, at no cost to the owner of the new motor vehicle, to ship the new motor vehicle to a repair facility outside of the remote location and to return the new motor vehicle to the remote location after the repairs are completed.

A manufacturer may direct a new motor vehicle dealer of the manufacturer to refer customers of the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer if the new motor vehicles of the customers are located in remote locations and need repairs.

This section does not prohibit a manufacturer from allowing a new motor vehicle dealer to subcontract warranty work for a specific new motor vehicle that is located in a remote location. If the manufacturer allows the new motor vehicle dealer to subcontract the warranty work, the manufacturer shall compensate the new motor vehicle dealer for the subcontracted warranty work paid for by the new motor vehicle dealer.

In this section, “remote location” means a location that is not accessible by road or that is more than 100 road miles from a new motor vehicle dealer that is authorized to perform warranty work on new motor vehicles.

History.

(§ 12 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 12,
ch. 50, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 30, 2018.

Sec. 45.25.230.
Preparation and service before delivery.

A manufacturer and a distributor shall provide in writing the following information to their new motor vehicle dealers about new motor vehicles and other products received from the manufacturer or distributor:

the specific obligations of the new motor vehicle dealer to prepare and service new motor vehicles and products before delivery of the new motor vehicles and products to buyers;

the compensation that the manufacturer or distributor will pay the dealer for performing the preparation and service obligations described in (1) of this section; and

the amount of time that the manufacturer or distributor will allow the new motor vehicle dealer for performing the preparation and service obligations described in (1) of this section.

History.

(§ 12 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 50, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 30, 2018.